California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, for initial adoption assistance agreements executed on or after January 1, 2017, and before July 1, 2027, or the effective date specified in paragraph (9) of subdivision (h) of Section 11461, as applicable, the adoptive family shall be paid an amount of aid based on the child’s needs otherwise covered in AFDC-FC payments and the circumstances of the adopting parents, but that amount shall not exceed the home-based family care rate structure developed pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 11461 and Section 11463, inclusive of any level of care determination, plus any applicable specialized care increment. This paragraph shall not preclude any reassessments of the child’s needs consistent with other provisions of this chapter.

(6) (A) For initial adoption assistance agreements executed on and after the date specified in paragraph (9) of subdivision (h) of Section 11461, the adoptive family shall be paid an amount of aid based on the child’s needs otherwise covered in AFDC-FC payments and the circumstances of the adopting parents, but that amount shall not exceed Tier 1 of the Care and Supervision component of the Tiered Rate Structure, as described in subdivision (h) of Section 11461, plus any applicable specialized care increment. This paragraph shall not preclude any reassessments of the child’s needs consistent with other provisions of this chapter.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the department shall issue written guidance regarding the specific conditions under which an adoptive family may be paid an amount of aid based on the child’s needs that exceeds Tier 1, but shall
 not exceed Tier 2, of the Care and Supervision component of the Tiered Rate Structure, as described in subdivision (h) of Section 11461, plus any applicable specialized care increment.

(b) For purposes of this paragraph, prior to January 1, 2028, payment may be made on behalf of an otherwise eligible child in a state-approved group home, short-term residential therapeutic program, or residential care treatment facility if the department or county responsible for determining payment has confirmed that the placement is necessary for the temporary resolution of mental
 health, behavioral health, or emotional health needs of the child. Out-of-home in-state placements shall be in accordance with the applicable provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code and other applicable statutes and regulations governing eligibility for AFDC-FC payments for placements in in-state facilities. If the placement is out-of-state, payments may be made only if the provisions of Section 16121.5 are met. The Adoption Assistance Program (AAP) rate paid on behalf of the child shall not exceed the rate paid for a short-term residential therapeutic program. The designation of the placement facility shall be made after consultation with the adoptive family by the department or county welfare agency responsible for determining the Adoption Assistance Program eligibility and authorizing financial aid. Group home, short-term
 residential therapeutic program, or residential placement shall only be made as part of a plan for return of the child to the adoptive family, that shall actively participate in the plan. Adoption Assistance Program benefits may be authorized for payment for an eligible child’s group home, short-term residential therapeutic program, or residential treatment facility placement if the placement is justified by a specific episode or condition and does not exceed an 18-month cumulative period of time. After an initial authorized group home, short-term residential therapeutic program, or residential treatment facility placement, subsequent authorizations for payment for a group home, short-term residential therapeutic program, or residential treatment facility placement may be based on an eligible child’s subsequent specific episodes or conditions.

(c) (1) Payments on behalf of a child who is a recipient of AAP benefits who is
 also a consumer of regional center services shall be based on the rates established by the State Department of Social Services pursuant to Section 11464 and subject to the process described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 16119.

(2) (A) Except as provided for in subparagraph (B), this subdivision shall apply to adoption assistance agreements signed on or after July 1, 2007.

(B) Rates paid on behalf of regional center consumers who are recipients of AAP benefits and for whom an adoption assistance agreement was executed before July 1, 2007, shall remain in effect, and may only be changed in accordance with Section 16119.

(i) If the rates paid pursuant to adoption assistance agreements executed before July 1, 2007, are lower than the rates specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision
 (c) or paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 11464, respectively, those rates shall be increased, as appropriate and in accordance with Section 16119, to the amount set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) or paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 11464, effective July 1, 2007. Once set, the rates shall remain in effect and may only be changed in accordance with Section 16119.

(ii) For purposes of this clause, for a child who is a recipient of AAP benefits or for whom the execution of an AAP agreement is pending, and who has been deemed eligible for or has sought an eligibility determination for regional center services pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4512, and for whom a determination of eligibility for those regional center services has been made, and for whom, before July 1, 2007, a maximum rate determination has been requested and is pending, the rate shall be determined through an individualized assessment and
 pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 35333 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations as in effect on January 1, 2007, or the rate established in subdivision (b) of Section 11464, whichever is greater. Once the rate has been set, it shall remain in effect and may only be changed in accordance with Section 16119. Other than the circumstances described in this clause, regional centers shall not make maximum rate benefit determinations for the AAP.

(3) Regional centers shall separately purchase or secure the services contained in the child’s IFSP or IPP, pursuant to Section 4684.

(4) Regulations adopted by the department pursuant to this subdivision shall be adopted as emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and for the purposes of that
 chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of these regulations is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, and general welfare. The regulations authorized by this paragraph shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days, by which time final regulations shall be adopted.

(d) (1) In the event that a family signs an adoption assistance agreement where a cash benefit is not awarded, the adopting family shall be otherwise eligible to receive Medi-Cal benefits for the child if it is determined that the benefits are needed pursuant to this chapter.

(2) Regional centers shall separately purchase or secure the services that are contained in the child’s Individualized Family Service Plan (IFSP) or Individual Program Plan (IPP)
 pursuant to Section 4684.

(e) The adoption assistance payment rate structure identified in subdivision (a) shall be adjusted by the percentage changes in the California Necessities Index, beginning with the 2011–12 fiscal year, and shall not require a reassessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 26, Sec. 27.   (AB 152)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

16121.05.

(a) The department or county adoption agency may recover any overpayments of financial assistance under the Adoption Assistance Program, and shall develop regulations that establish the means to recoup them, including an appropriate notice of action and appeal rights, when the department determines either of the following applies:

(1) The adoptive parents are no longer legally responsible for the support of the child.

(2) The child is no longer receiving support from the adoptive family.

(3) The adoptive family has committed
 fraud in its application for, or reassessment of, the adoption assistance.

(b) Children on whose behalf an adoption assistance agreement had been executed prior to October 1, 1992, shall continue to receive adoption assistance in accordance with the terms of that agreement.

(c) Payment shall begin on or after the effective date of an adoption assistance agreement, or a deferred adoption assistance agreement, or a final decree of adoption, provided that the adoption assistance agreement has been signed by all required parties prior to or at the time the adoption decree is issued by the court. The amount and duration of assistance shall not be changed without the concurrence of the adoptive parents, unless any of the following has occurred:

(1) The child has attained 18 years of age, or 21 years of age where the child
 has a mental or physical disability that warrants the continuation of assistance.

(2) The adoptive parents are no longer legally responsible for the support of the child.

(3) The child is no longer receiving any support from adoptive parents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 111.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

16121.1.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 11105, the residence of the adoptive parents at the time of or subsequent to adoptive placement shall not terminate the eligibility of a child who is otherwise eligible for adoptive assistance payments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 977, Sec. 28.5.   Effective September 13, 1982.   Operative October 1, 1982, by Sec. 36 of Ch. 977.)
-------------------------------------------

16121.2.

The Director of Social Services and the Director of Health Services may enter into interstate agreements pursuant to Chapter 2.6 (commencing with Section 16170) that provide for medical and other necessary services for special needs children, establish procedures for interstate delivery of adoption assistance and related services and benefits, and provide for the adoption of related regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 887, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

16121.3.

(a) (1) Adoption Assistance Program (AAP) payments may be made on behalf of an otherwise eligible child for wraparound services in lieu of an out-of-home placement if the responsible public agency has confirmed that the wraparound services are necessary for the temporary resolution of the mental health, behavioral health, or emotional health needs of the child.

(2) AAP benefits may be authorized to pay for an eligible child’s wraparound services if the services are justified by a specific condition and authorization does not exceed a 12-month cumulative period of time. After a 12-month cumulative period of payment for wraparound services, additional authorizations for payment for wraparound services for an eligible
 child may be based on the continued need to resolve a condition described in paragraph (1). Consecutive authorizations shall be assessed after each 12-month cumulative period of time. The AAP payment may only be made if the wraparound services and the provider meet the California wraparound standards and provider certification requirements, or similar requirements specific to wraparound service providers in the child’s state of residence if the child and family reside in another state.

(b) The AAP rate paid on behalf of a child receiving wraparound services in lieu of an out-of-home placement shall be consistent with either of the following:

(1) The rate shall not exceed the rate paid for a foster care placement in a short-term residential therapeutic program, as defined in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) On the date that the department notifies the Legislature that the California Statewide Automated Welfare System and the statewide child welfare information system (known as the California Automated Response and Engagement System or CWS-CARES) can perform the necessary automation to implement the Tiered Rate Structure and the Legislature makes an appropriation as described in subdivision (h) of Section 11461, the AAP rate paid on behalf of a child receiving wraparound services in lieu of an out-of-home placement shall not exceed the sum of all of the following:

(A) The Tier 3+ Care and Supervision rate established under paragraph (3) of subdivision (h) of Section 11461.

(B) The Tier 3+ administrative and other activities rate established under paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 11462.

(C) The
 Tier 3+ Immediate Needs Funding established under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 16562.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “California wraparound standards” means the use of a California high-fidelity wraparound model, approved by the department and consistent with the requirements of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18250) of Part 6.

(2) “Responsible public agency” means the department or county adoption agency responsible for determining a child’s AAP eligibility and initial and subsequent payment amount.

(3) “Wraparound services” has the same meaning as in Section 18251.

(d) The designation of a
 wraparound services provider shall be made by the family, after consultation with the responsible public agency. When adoptive parents decide to utilize wraparound services for an AAP-eligible child, they are private pay consumers. Wraparound service contracts shall be between the adoptive parents and the wraparound services provider. Alternatively, the family may authorize the county to contract for wraparound services on their behalf.

(e) Prior to the authorization of AAP benefits for wraparound services, the wraparound services provider shall provide verification to the adoptive parents documenting that the wraparound services meet the California wraparound standards and provider certification requirements, or similar requirements specific to wraparound service providers in the child’s state of residence if the child and family reside in another state. The adoptive parents shall provide the verification to the responsible public agency, or
 the county may verify the provider meets the standards of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) if the information is posted on the department’s internet website.

(f) If the child and family reside in another state, a wraparound services provider in the child’s state of residence may be utilized, and paid for with AAP benefits, if the requirements of this section are met, in whole or in part, subject to departmental approval.

(g) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions, which shall be exempt from submission to or review by the Office of Administrative Law. These all-county letters or similar instructions shall
 have the same force and effect as regulations.

(h) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 26, Sec. 28.   (AB 152)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

16121.4.

(a) (1) Adoption Assistance Program (AAP) payments may be made on behalf of an otherwise eligible child in a facility licensed as a short-term residential therapeutic program if the responsible public agency has confirmed that the short-term residential therapeutic program is necessary for the temporary resolution of the mental health, behavioral health, or emotional health needs of the child.

(2) (A) AAP benefits may be authorized to pay for an eligible child’s short-term residential therapeutic program if the placement is justified by a specific condition and authorization does not exceed a 12-month cumulative period of time, unless an exception is granted pursuant to paragraph (3).

(B) Transition planning shall begin when the child enters the short-term residential therapeutic program. If additional time is needed to transition the child home according to the transition plan, payment at the rate described in subdivision (b) may continue up to an additional 60 calendar days if the child remains in the placement. If the services the child needs to transition out of the short-term residential therapeutic program cannot be put in place within the additional 60 calendar days, payment may continue for an additional 30 days if the reason for the extension is documented in the child’s transition plan and authorized by the responsible public agency based upon a specific finding that the additional time is necessary because of the delay in services.

(3) An additional one-time six-month cumulative period of time may be provided when a psychiatrist or physician provides
 current documentation to demonstrate that the current short-term residential therapeutic program services are benefiting the child and that the child requires additional short-term residential therapeutic program services. If the child is not placed in a short-term residential therapeutic program, the psychiatrist or physician shall provide current documentation to demonstrate that the child would benefit from returning to the short-term residential therapeutic program.

(b) The AAP rate paid on behalf of a child in a facility licensed as a short-term residential therapeutic program shall be consistent with either of the following:

(1) The rate shall not exceed the rate paid for a foster care placement in a short-term residential therapeutic program.

(2) On the date that the department notifies the Legislature that
 the California Statewide Automated Welfare System and the statewide child welfare information system (known as the California Automated Response and Engagement System or CWS-CARES) can perform the necessary automation to implement the Tiered Rate Structure and the Legislature makes an appropriation as described in subdivision (h) of Section 11461, the AAP rate paid on behalf of a child in a short-term residential therapeutic program shall not exceed the sum of all of the following:

(A) The Tier 3+ Care and Supervision rate established under paragraph (3) of subdivision (h) of Section 11461.

(B) The Tier 3+ administrative and other activities rate established under paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 11462.

(C) The Tier 3+ Immediate Needs Funding established under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of
 subdivision (d) of Section 16562.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Responsible public agency” means the department or county adoption agency responsible for determining a child’s AAP eligibility and initial and subsequent payment amount.

(2) “Short-term residential therapeutic program” has the same meaning as in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) The designation of the placement facility shall be made, after consultation with the responsible public agency, by the adoptive parents. A short-term residential therapeutic program placement shall only be made as part of a plan for the return of the child to the adoptive family and the adoptive parents shall actively participate in the
 reunification plan.

(e) AAP benefits, as described in this section, shall only be authorized for an eligible child in a facility licensed as a short-term residential therapeutic program in California and shall not be authorized for any other out-of-home placement option within California.

(f) Following discharge from a short-term residential therapeutic program, the child shall be eligible for payment to be made for wraparound services, as described in Section 16121.3.

(g) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions, which shall be exempt from
 submission to or review by the Office of Administrative Law. These all-county letters or similar instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations.

(h) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 26, Sec. 29.   (AB 152)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

16121.41.

The department shall develop curriculum for optional use by counties to inform and educate adoptive families, prior to adoption finalization. The department shall consult with county placing agencies and community partners in the development of this curriculum. The curriculum shall include, at a minimum, education on maintaining Adoption Assistance Program benefits, adolescent development and trauma, the importance of maintaining Medi-Cal, the benefits of using adoption-competent clinicians, and how to secure trauma-informed services. This curriculum shall be developed and distributed to counties no later than January 1, 2028.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 26, Sec. 30.   (AB 152)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

16121.5.

(a) Adoption Assistance Program (AAP) payments may be made on behalf of an otherwise eligible child for placement in out-of-state residential treatment facility if one or more of the adoptive parents reside in the state in which the residential treatment facility is located and the responsible public agency has confirmed that placement in the an out-of-state residential treatment facility is necessary for the temporary resolution of the mental health, behavioral health, or emotional health needs of the child and related to a condition that existed before the adoptive placement.

(b) AAP benefits may be authorized for payment for an eligible child’s placement in an out-of-state residential treatment facility if the responsible public agency has determined that
 both of the following conditions exist:

(1) One or more of the adoptive parents reside in the state in which the residential treatment facility is located.

(2) The placement is justified by a specific condition and does not exceed a 12-month cumulative period of time. For the purpose of transitioning the child home, payment at the rate described in subdivision (d) may continue for up to an additional 60 calendar days if the child remains placed at the out-of-state residential treatment facility.

(c) The designation of the placement facility shall be made, after consultation with the adoptive family, by the responsible public agency. Placement in an out-of-state residential treatment facility shall only be made as part of a plan for return of the child to the adoptive family and the adoptive parents shall actively
 participate in the reunification plan.

(d) The AAP rate paid on behalf of the child for an out-of-state residential treatment facility shall not exceed the lesser amount of the following:

(1) The rate paid for a foster care placement in a short-term residential therapeutic program, as defined in paragraph (18) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The rate determined by the ratesetting authority in the state in which the out-of-state residential treatment facility is located.

(e) (1) For the purpose of this section, “out-of-state residential treatment facility” means a facility that is located in a state outside of California, is licensed and in good standing or otherwise approved and in good
 standing by the applicable state or tribal authority, is eligible as a Title IV-E funded placement in the state in which it is situated, and provides an integrated program of specialized and intensive care and supervision, services and supports, treatment, and short-term, 24-hour, trauma-informed care and supervision to children. An out-of-state residential treatment facility may be called another name, including a group home, a residential facility, or a residential care treatment facility. An out-of-state residential treatment facility shall have a trauma-informed therapeutic focus to treat a child’s mental health, behavioral health, emotional health, and attachment needs, and shall have a mental health clinic program.

(2) For purposes of this section, “out-of-state residential treatment facility” shall not include wilderness programs, boot camps, detention facilities, any facility operated primarily for the detention of youth who are
 involved in the juvenile justice system, academies, or schools, including, but not limited to, boarding schools and military schools.

(3) For purposes of this section, “responsible public agency” means the department or county adoption agency responsible for determining a child’s AAP eligibility and initial and subsequent payment amount.

(f) (1) Prior to the authorization of AAP benefits in the out-of-state residential treatment facility, the adoptive family shall provide proof of licensing and accreditation to the responsible public agency. The adoptive family shall provide verification that the out-of-state residential treatment facility is all of the following:

(A) Licensed or otherwise approved by the applicable state or tribal authority.

(B) In good standing.

(C) Eligible as a Title IV-E funded placement.

(D) A qualified residential treatment program, as defined in the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 672(k)(4)).

(2) The documentation required by paragraph (1) shall originate from the government agency or tribal authority that licenses or otherwise approves the out-of-state residential treatment facility, or the appropriate state or tribal Title IV-E agency.

(g) Commencing September 1, 2025, and annually thereafter, county adoption agencies shall provide all of the following information to the department:

(1) The total number of children in out-of-state residential treatment facilities.

(2) The name and location of each out-of-state residential treatment facility during the reporting period.

(3) The number of days each child placed in an out-of-state residential treatment facility remained in that facility.

(h) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to invalidate or alter the terms or conditions of adoption assistance agreements executed before the effective date of this section. For a child who is placed in any facility outside of California funded through AAP before June 30, 2025, or the effective date of this section, whichever date is later, and remains in placement on June 30, 2025, or the effective date of this section, whichever date is later, payment at the negotiated benefit amount shall not exceed the timeframe authorized in the adoption assistance agreement in effect on June 30, 2025,
 or the effective date of this section, whichever date is later, unless the responsible public agency and the adoptive parents have negotiated and agreed upon up to an additional 60 calendar days for the purpose of transitioning the child home.

(i) The department shall engage child welfare advocates, county child welfare agencies, tribes, and interested stakeholders to update policies regarding the use of AAP for wraparound and out-of-home placements, including planning for transition back home to the family setting, and shall provide to the Legislature proposed statutory changes no later than February 1, 2026.

(j) The department shall provide guidance to counties regarding the
 steps necessary to document the requirements described in this section and shall develop processes to regularly document that the out-of-state residential treatment facility continues to meet the requirements of subdivision (f).

(k) (1) Subject to an appropriation by the Legislature for these purposes, the department shall directly, or through contract with a service provider, ensure transition support services are made available to adoptive families. Transition support services shall include, at minimum, all of the following:

(A) Assist families in identifying and linking to needed services for their adopted child.

(B) Assist the family with access to wraparound services, if needed.

(C) Connect to mental health services, preferably with a provider who has been trained in adoption competencies, unless declined by the family.

(D) Connect to the local county social services agency to reapply or reinstate Medi-Cal coverage for adoptive families to connect to services and link to enhanced care management and other benefits and services that are available through Medi-Cal managed care plans, if determined eligible for Medi-Cal and enrolled in a Medi-Cal managed care plan.

(2) The responsible public agency shall refer the family to postpermanency services at the local level to support the adoptive family in navigating postpermanency services, in accordance with guidance to be developed by the department in consultation with counties and stakeholders.

(l) Subject to an appropriation by the Legislature for these purposes, the department shall ensure both of the following activities are completed:

(1) The department shall interview adoptive parents who voluntarily agree or who decide to submit information directly to the department regarding the reason that out-of-state placement was necessary, the specific services received out of state, services received to support the transition back to California, and the current status of their adoptive children who returned to California on or after July 1, 2025. A report shall be provided to the Legislature, consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on January 14, 2028.

(2) Engage adoptive families, youth, adoption agencies, child welfare advocates, county child welfare agencies, tribes, and other interested
 stakeholders to identify the training, services, supports, and any gaps that exist to support adoptive families connecting to resources before crises escalate to wraparound or residential placement and shall provide to the Legislature proposed statutory changes no later than August 1, 2028.

(m) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions and amended forms, which shall be exempt
 from submission to or review by the Office of Administrative Law. These all-county letters or similar instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations.

(n) This section is inoperative on July 1, 2027, or the date that the department notifies the Legislature that the California Statewide Automated Welfare System and the Statewide Child Welfare Information System (currently the California Automated Response and Engagement System (CWS-CARES)) can perform the necessary automation to implement the Tiered Rate Structure described in subdivision (h) of Section 11461, whichever is later, and is repealed as of January 1 of the following year.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 107, Sec. 6) by Stats. 2026, Ch. 26, Sec. 31.   (AB 152)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Conditionally inoperative on or after July 1, 2027, as prescribed by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1 following inoperative date.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 32 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

16121.5.

(a) Adoption Assistance Program (AAP) payments may be made on behalf of an otherwise eligible child for placement in an out-of-state residential treatment facility if one or more of the adoptive parents reside in the state in which the residential treatment facility is located and the responsible public agency has confirmed that placement in the out-of-state residential treatment facility is necessary for the temporary resolution of the mental health, behavioral health, or emotional health needs of the child and related to a condition that existed before the adoptive placement.

(b) AAP benefits may be authorized for payment for an eligible child’s placement in an out-of-state residential treatment facility if the responsible public agency has determined that
 both of the following conditions exist:

(1) One or more of the adoptive parents reside in the state in which the residential treatment facility is located.

(2) The placement is justified by a specific condition and does not exceed a 12-month cumulative period of time. For the purpose of transitioning the child home, payment at the rate described in subdivision (d) may continue for up to an additional 60 calendar days if the child remains placed at the out-of-state residential treatment facility.

(c) The designation of the placement facility shall be made, after consultation with the adoptive family, by the responsible public agency. Placement in an out-of-state residential treatment facility shall only be made as part of a plan for return of the child to the adoptive family and the adoptive parents shall actively
 participate in the reunification plan.

(d) The AAP rate paid on behalf of the child for an out-of-state residential treatment facility shall not exceed the lesser amount of the following:

(1) The sum of all of the following:

(A) The Tier 3+ Care and Supervision rate established under paragraph (3) of subdivision (h) of Section 11461.

(B) The Tier 3+ administrative rate established under paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 11462.

(C) The Tier 3+ Immediate Needs Funding established under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 16562.

(2) The rate determined by the ratesetting authority in the
 state in which the out-of-state residential treatment facility is located.

(e) (1) For the purpose of this section, “out-of-state residential treatment facility” means a facility that is located in a state outside of California, is licensed and in good standing or otherwise approved and in good standing by the applicable state or tribal authority, is eligible as a Title IV-E funded placement in the state in which it is situated, and provides an integrated program of specialized and intensive care and supervision, services and supports, treatment, and short-term, 24-hour, trauma-informed care and supervision to children. An out-of-state residential treatment facility may be called another name, including a group home, a residential facility, or a residential care treatment facility. An out-of-state residential treatment facility shall have a trauma-informed therapeutic focus to treat a child’s mental health, behavioral
 health, emotional health, and attachment needs, and shall have a mental health clinic program.

(2) For purposes of this section, “out-of-state residential treatment facility” shall not include wilderness programs, boot camps, detention facilities, any facility operated primarily for the detention of youth who are involved in the juvenile justice system, academies, or schools, including, but not limited to, boarding schools and military schools.

(3) For purposes of this section, “responsible public agency” means the department or county adoption agency responsible for determining a child’s AAP eligibility and initial and subsequent payment amount.

(f) (1) Prior to the authorization of AAP benefits in the out-of-state residential treatment facility, the adoptive family shall provide proof of
 licensing and accreditation to the responsible public agency. The adoptive family shall provide verification that the out-of-state residential treatment facility is all of the following:

(A) Licensed or otherwise approved by the applicable state or tribal authority.

(B) In good standing.

(C) Eligible as a Title IV-E funded placement.

(D) A qualified residential treatment program, as defined in the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 672(k)(4)).

(2) The documentation required by paragraph (1) shall originate from the government agency or tribal authority that licenses or otherwise approves the out-of-state residential treatment facility, or the appropriate state or tribal Title IV-E
 agency.

(g) County adoption agencies shall annually provide all of the following information to the department:

(1) The total number of children in out-of-state residential treatment facilities.

(2) The name and location of each out-of-state residential treatment facility during the reporting period.

(3) The number of days each child placed in an out-of-state residential treatment facility remained in that facility.

(h) The department shall provide guidance to counties regarding the steps
 necessary to document the requirements described in this section and shall develop processes to regularly document that the out-of-state residential treatment facility continues to meet the requirements of subdivision (f).

(i) (1) Subject to an appropriation by the Legislature for these purposes, the department shall directly, or through contract with a service provider, ensure transition support services are made available to adoptive families. Transition support services shall include, at minimum, all of the following:

(A) Assist families in identifying and linking to needed services for their adopted child.

(B) Assist the family with access to wraparound services, if needed.

(C) Connect to mental health services, preferably with a provider who has been trained in adoption competencies, unless declined by the family.

(D) Connect to the local county social services agency to reapply or reinstate Medi-Cal coverage for adoptive families to connect to services and link to enhanced care management and other benefits and services that are available through Medi-Cal managed care plans, if determined eligible for Medi-Cal and enrolled in a Medi-Cal managed care plan.

(2) The responsible public agency shall refer the family to postpermanency services at the local level to support the adoptive family in navigating postpermanency services, in accordance with guidance to be developed by the department in consultation with counties and stakeholders.

(j) Subject to an appropriation by the Legislature for these purposes, the department shall ensure both of the following activities are completed:

(1) The department shall interview adoptive parents who voluntarily agree or who decide to submit information directly to the department regarding the reason that out-of-state placement was necessary, the specific services received out of state, services received to support the transition back to California, and the current status of their adoptive children who returned to California on or after July 1, 2025. A report shall be provided to the Legislature, consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on January 14, 2028.

(2) Engage adoptive families, youth, adoption agencies, child welfare advocates, county child welfare agencies, tribes, and other interested stakeholders to identify the training, services, supports,